Rhode Island, session 2025, SB898.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 104
HEALTHCARE WORKER PLATFORM ACT
23-104-1. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthcare Worker Platform Act."
23-104-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings:
(a) “Healthcare worker platform" means any person, corporation, partnership, or
association that operates or offers a platform. A “healthcare worker platform” is not considered a
“nursing service agency” as defined in § 23-17.7.1-2.
(b) “Platform” means an electronic platform, system, or application through which
healthcare workers can accept one or more shifts to perform healthcare related services at a
healthcare facility.
23-104-3. Registration of healthcare worker platforms.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, a healthcare worker platform shall
be excluded from the definition of a “nursing service agency” as defined by §§ 23-17.7.1-3, 23-
17.7.1-10, and 23-17.7.1-19.

(b) On or before June 1, 2026, the department of health shall promulgate rules and
regulations that shall require the registration of each healthcare worker platform that operates or
offers a platform within the state. The requirements for registration of each healthcare worker
platform shall not exceed the requirements of §§ 23-17.7.1-3, 23-17.7.1-10, and 23-17.7.1-19.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002366
========
LC002366 - Page 2 of 3